North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8. Evidence.
Article 4. Other Writings in Evidence.

§ 8-38.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983 (Regular Session, 1984), c. 1037, s. 13.

Cross References.

As to provision that a subscribing witness’ testimony is not necessary, see

G.S. 8C-1

, Rule 903.

§ 8-39.
Parol evidence to identify land described.

In all actions for the possession of or title to any real estate parol testimony may be introduced to identify the land sued for, and fit it to the description contained in the paper-writing offered as evidence of title or of the right of possession, and if from this evidence the jury is satisfied that the land in question is the identical land intended to be conveyed by the parties to such paper-writing, then such paper-writing shall be deemed and taken to be sufficient in law to pass such title to or interest in such land as it purports to pass: Provided, that such paper-writing is in all other respects sufficient to pass such title or interest.

History.

1891, c. 465, s. 1; Rev., s. 1605; C.S., s. 1783.

Cross References.

As to vagueness of description in deeds, see

G.S. 39-2

.

§ 8-40.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983 (Regular Session, 1984), c. 1037, s. 12.

Cross References.

As to comparison by the trier of factor expert witnesses with specimens which have been authenticated, see

G.S. 8C-1

, Rule 901(b)(3).

§ 8-40.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983 (Regular Session, 1984), c. 1037, s. 10.

Cross References.

As to present provisions relating to the learned treatise exception to the hearsay rule, see

G.S. 8C-1

, Rule 803(18).

§ 8-41.
Bills of lading in evidence.

In all actions by or against common carriers or in the trial of any criminal action in which it shall be thought necessary to introduce in evidence any bills of lading issued by said common carrier or by a connecting carrier, it shall be competent to introduce in evidence any paper-writing purporting to be the original bill of lading, or a duplicate thereof, upon proof that such paper purporting to be such bill of lading or duplicate was received in due course of mail from consignor or agent of said carrier or connecting carrier, or delivered by said common carrier to the consignee or other person entitled to the possession of the property for which said paper purports to be the bill of lading: Provided, that such purported bill of lading shall not be declared to be the bill of lading unless the said purported bill of lading is first exhibited by the plaintiff or his agent or attorney to the defendant or its attorney, or its agent upon whom process may be served, ten days before the trial where the point of shipment is in the State, and twenty days when the point of shipment is without the State. Upon such proof and introduction of the bill of lading, the due execution thereof shall be prima facie established.

History.

1915, c. 287; C.S., s. 1785; 1945, c. 97.

§ 8-42.
Book accounts under sixty dollars.

When any person shall bring an action upon a contract, or shall plead, or give notice of, a setoff or counterclaim for goods, wares and merchandise by him sold and delivered, or for work done and performed, he shall file his account with his complaint, or with his plea or notice of setoff or counterclaim, and if upon the trial of the issue, or executing a writ of inquiry of damages in such action, he shall declare upon his oath that the matter in dispute is a book account, and that he hath no means to prove the delivery of any of the articles which he then shall propose to prove by himself but by this book, in that case such book may be given in evidence, if he shall make out by his own oath that it doth contain a true account of all the dealings, or the last settlement of accounts between himself and the opposing party, and that all the articles therein contained, and by him so proved, were bona fide delivered, and that he hath given the opposing party all just credits; and such book and oath shall be received as evidence for the several articles so proved to be delivered within two years next before the commencement of the action, but not for any article of a longer standing, nor for any greater amount than sixty dollars ($60.00).

History.

1756, c. 57, ss. 2, 6, 7, P.R; R.C., c. 15, s. 1; Code, s. 591; Rev., s. 1622; C.S., s. 1786.

§ 8-43.
Book accounts proved by personal representative.

In all actions where executors and administrators are parties, such book account for all articles delivered within two years previous to the death of the deceased may be proved under the like circumstances, rules and conditions; and in such case, the executor or administrator may prove by himself that he found the account so stated on the books of the deceased; that there are no witnesses, to his knowledge, capable of proving the delivery of the articles which he shall propose to prove by said book, and that he believes the same to be just, and doth not know of any other or further credit to be given than what is therein mentioned: Provided, that if two years shall not have elapsed previous to the death of the deceased, the executor or administrator may prove the said book account, if the suit shall be commenced within three years from the delivery of the articles: Provided further, that whenever by the aforesaid proviso the time of proving a book account in manner aforesaid is enlarged as to the one party, to the same extent shall be enlarged the time as to the other party.

History.

1756, c. 57, s. 2, P.R; 1796, c. 465, P.R; R.C., c. 15, s. 2; Code, s. 592; Rev., s. 1623; C.S., s. 1787.

§ 8-44.
Copies of book accounts in evidence.

A copy from the book of accounts proved in manner above directed may be given in evidence in any such action or setoff as aforesaid, and shall be as available as if such book had been produced, unless the party opposing such proof shall give notice to the adverse party or his attorney, at the joining of the issue, or 10 days before the trial, that he will require the book to be produced at the trials; and in that case no such copy shall be admitted as evidence.

History.

1756, c. 57, s. 33, P.R; R.C., c. 15, s. 3; C.C.P., s. 343c; Code, s. 593; Rev., s. 1624; C.S., s. 1788.

§ 8-44.1.
Hospital medical records.

Copies or originals of hospital medical records shall not be held inadmissible in any court action or proceeding on the grounds that they lack certification, identification, or authentication, and shall be received as evidence if otherwise admissible, in any court or quasi-judicial proceeding, if they have been tendered to the presiding judge or designee by the custodian of the records, in accordance with

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 45(c), or if they are certified, identified, and authenticated by the live testimony of the custodian of such records.

Hospital medical records are defined for purposes of this section and

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 45(c) as records made in connection with the diagnosis, care and treatment of any patient or the charges for such services except that records covered by G.S. 122-8.1, G.S. 90-109.1 and federal statutory or regulatory provisions regarding alcohol and drug abuse, are subject to the requirements of said statutes.

History.

1973, c. 1332, s. 1; 1983, c. 665, s. 2.

§ 8-45.
Itemized and verified accounts.

In any actions instituted in any court of this State upon an account for goods sold and delivered, for rents, for services rendered, or labor performed, or upon any oral contract for money loaned, a verified itemized statement of such account shall be received in evidence, and shall be deemed prima facie evidence of its correctness.

History.

1897, c. 480; Rev., s. 1625; 1917, c. 32; C.S., s. 1789; 1941, c. 104.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1976 case law on evidence, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 1033 (1977).